Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1192XS (4) 91 lh/ko S.F. 131 Section 1. EVIDENCE-BASED MATERNAL AND INFANT HOME VISITING 1 SERVICES. 2 1. The department of health and human services shall 3 engage in a cross-agency collaboration with the department 4 of education to identify and leverage funding sources and 5 opportunities, including Medicaid, to expand evidence-based 6 home visiting services for women and infants that promote 7 healthy pregnancies, positive birth outcomes, and healthy 8 infant growth and development. The departments shall involve 9 key stakeholders in designing an evidence-based home visiting 10 services approach for the state that maximizes the coordination 11 and integration of programs and funding streams, reduces 12 duplication of efforts, and ensures that the services provided 13 meet federal evidence-based criteria. The approach shall 14 ensure that evidence-based home visiting services shall be 15 available to women prenatally, throughout the pregnancy, and 16 postpartum, and shall include mental and physical health, 17 social, educational, and other services and interventions based 18 upon the risk factors and needs identified. The departments 19 may conduct a feasibility study to consider the various 20 options available to increase Medicaid coverage and funding of 21 evidence-based home visiting services, either through a state 22 plan amendment or waiver. The department of health and human 23 services shall seek federal approval of any Medicaid state plan 24 amendment or waiver necessary to administer this section. 25 2. The department of health and human services shall 26 submit a report to the general assembly by July 1, 2026, 27 that identifies the number of individuals who received 28 evidence-based home visiting services as a result of the 29 funding sources and opportunities identified and leveraged 30 pursuant to subsection 1. 31